Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
CHAPTER 5 Correctional Institutions of State and Counties

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 270, § 13, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly recognizes that criminal street gangs have succeeded at times in maintaining their structure, organization, and discipline in penal institutions and have continued to conduct criminal activities while incarcerated. Therefore, the General Assembly requests and encourages state and local officials with responsibility for the operation of adult and juvenile penal institutions and related facilities to develop policies and procedures which will identify members of criminal street gangs and, where necessary, to separate members and associates of the same criminal street gang in order that such gang members cannot maintain the gang’s structure, organization, and discipline and will have a more difficult time in conducting criminal activities while incarcerated in this state.”